Washington statutes.
RCW 2.10.120

Retirement for disability—Procedure.

(1) Any judge who has served as a judge for a period of ten or more years, and who shall believe he or she has become physically or otherwise permanently incapacitated for the full and efficient performance of the duties of his or her office, may file with the retirement board an application in writing, asking for retirement. Upon receipt of such application the retirement board shall appoint one or more physicians of skill and repute, duly licensed to practice their professions in the state of Washington, who shall, within fifteen days thereafter, for such compensation as may be fixed by the board, to be paid out of the fund herein created, examine said judge and report in writing to the board their findings in the matter. If the physicians appointed by the board find the judge to be so disabled and the retirement board concurs in this finding the judge shall be retired.

(2) The retirement for disability of a judge, who has served as a judge for a period of ten or more years, by the supreme court under Article IV, section 31 of the Constitution of the state of Washington (House Joint Resolution No. 37, approved by the voters November 4, 1980), with the concurrence of the retirement board, shall be considered a retirement under subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2011 c 336 s 25; 1982 c 18 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 267 s 12.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: House Joint Resolution No. 37, approved by the voters November 4, 1980, became Amendment 71 to the state Constitution.